District of Columbia statutes.
38-272.02

Program audit requirement.

(a)

By July 2009, each pre-k program in the District shall have completed an evaluation, by an independent evaluator, and a financial audit to determine its standing in relation to the required HQ standards.

(b)

Within 30 days of July 18, 2008, the Mayor shall submit to the Council for its approval, a plan, including the name of a proposed independent evaluator, to evaluate pre-k programs in accordance with this section. Within 60 days of Council approval, the Mayor shall execute a contract with the approved evaluator.

(c)

The Mayor shall submit to the Council by September 30, 2009, the results of the program and financial audits.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 202, 55 DCR 6297